Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2206
Papers; endorsement.

The clerk of the court shall endorse upon every paper filed with him, the day of filing it; and upon every order for a provisional remedy, and upon every undertaking given under the same, the day of its return to his office.

R.S.1867, Code § 885, p. 547;

R.S.1913, § 8554;

C.S.1922, § 9505;

C.S.1929, § 20-2206;

R.S.1943, § 25-2206.

This section requires the clerk of the trial court to endorse the day of filing upon any document delivered to him or her for that purpose. State v. Muse, 15 Neb. App. 13, 721 N.W.2d 661 (2006).